Hawaii statutes.
§467-11.5 Prerequisites for license renewal.
(a) Prior to the license renewal of a real
estate broker or real estate salesperson, the licensee shall provide the
commission with proof of having attended at least twenty hours of continuing
education or its equivalent as determined by the commission during the two-year
period preceding the application for renewal. Failure to satisfy the
continuing education requirement by the license expiration date shall result in
the renewed license being automatically placed on an "inactive"
status.

(b) To
reactivate a license which has been placed on an "inactive" status,
the licensee shall submit to the commission proof of having satisfied the
continuing education requirement of this section, a complete application setting
forth the information as may be prescribed or required by the commission, and
payment of the proper fee.

(c) No
license shall be renewed if the license trade name, partnership, or corporation
is not currently registered with the department of commerce and consumer
affairs.

(d) Upon
submission of a renewal application, an individual real estate licensee, who
holds a current, unencumbered real estate license in another state, or who
holds a current, unencumbered real estate license in a jurisdiction recognized
by the Association of Real Estate License Law Officials, with an equivalent
real estate licensing law as determined by the commission, may request a
determination of equivalency for the elective course hours of the continuing
education requirement. The equivalency shall be based on the successful
completion of the continuing education requirements in the other state or
jurisdiction prior to submission of the renewal application. Approval of the
equivalency shall be subject to the real estate licensee completing the
commission-designated core course, as determined by the commission. [L
1987, c 95, §§1, 3; am L 1989, c 217, §2; am L 1994, c 68, §1; am L 1995, c
241, §§5, 11; am L 1996, c 149, §1; am L 1997, c 289, §3; am L 1999, c 47, §3;
am L 2002, c 129, §4; am L 2010, c 9, §2]

Note

$25 fee for equivalency determination application. L 2002, c
129, §7.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next